District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.155

Financial reporting.

(a)

No later than December 1, 2014, and on a quarterly basis thereafter, until the approval of the Fiscal Year 2016 budget and financial plan, the Chief Financial Officer shall provide a report to the Council on the following subjects:

(1)

Progress toward ensuring that the Fiscal Year 2016 budget will be balanced, including:

(A)

Savings achieved to date;

(B)

Additional revenue certified through revised revenue estimates; and

(C)

Additional revenue that may be certified through revenue enhancements;

(2)

An analysis of procurement reform efforts in Fiscal Year 2014, including:

(A)

Contracts reviewed for potential cost savings;

(B)

Savings secured through the renegotiation of existing contracts; and

(C)

A report from the Office of Contracting and Procurement to the Chief Financial Officer regarding subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph,

(3)

An analysis of personnel review efforts, including:

(A)

Positions left vacant or eliminated as a result of cost-savings initiatives; and

(B)

Savings secured through personnel savings; and

(4)

Any other operating budget savings achieved or targeted in Fiscal Year 2014.

(b)

Agencies shall report on their progress toward limiting personal and nonpersonal expenditures whether one-time or recurring.

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 1142, 61 DCR 9990
For temporary (90 days) addition of section, see §§ 1142 and 1143 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) addition of section, see § 1142 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) addition of section, see § 1142 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).